District of Columbia statutes.
29-1202.03

Signing of records.

(a)

A record delivered by the statutory trust to the Mayor for filing pursuant to this chapter shall be signed by at least one of the trustees.

(b)

Any person may sign by an attorney in fact any record filed pursuant to this chapter.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

History

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 203 of the Uniform Statutory Trust Entity Act.

Editor's Notes